Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-247
Election districts; establishment.

A primary city may divide the city into election districts, establish the boundaries thereof, and number the same.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XLVII, p. 139;

R.S.1913, § 4457;

C.S.1922, § 3842;

C.S.1929, § 15-245;

R.S.1943, § 15-247.